Maryland, session 2026, HB1215.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Economic Development
10–613.
(a) The Authority may:
(7) subject to [§ 10–620] §§ 10–615 AND 10–620 of this subtitle, acquire,
lease as landlord or tenant, hold, encumber, or dispose of property;
10–615.
(C) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “SHAMROCK FARMS” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 12–404(E) OF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(2) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 12–404(E) OF THE LOCAL
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE AUTHORITY MAY NOT SELL, TRANSFER, OR
OTHERWISE DISPOSE OF SHAMROCK FARMS.
Article – Local Government
12–404.
(a) Except for the procurement of an option to purchase real property, the County
Commissioners of Carroll County or a public agency of the county may not take final action
to purchase real property unless:
(1) the action is taken at a public meeting; and

HOUSE BILL 1215 3
(2) if the consideration for the property is $7,000 or more, the county
commissioners or public agency have given public notice of the intent to purchase the real
property at least 15 calendar days before the meeting.
(E) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “SHAMROCK FARMS” MEANS THE REAL
PROPERTY THAT THE BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS APPROVED THE PURCHASE OF ON
MAY 7, 2025, LOCATED AT 4926 WOODBINE ROAD, WOODBINE, MARYLAND 21797.
(2) IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBSECTION,
THE COUNTY COMMISSIONERS OF CARROLL COUNTY MAY PURCHASE AND THE
MARYLAND STADIUM AUTHORITY SHALL SELL TO THE COUNTY SHAMROCK FARMS
FOR $4,480,000, INCREASED BY A REASONABLE AMOUNT FOR INFLATION AS
DETERMINED BY THE BOARD OF PUBLIC WORKS AND LESS ANY AMOUNT THAT
CARROLL COUNTY CONTRIBUTED TO THE STATE’S PURCHASE.
(3) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2029, THE COUNTY COMMISSIONERS OF
CARROLL COUNTY SHALL NOTIFY THE MARYLAND STADIUM AUTHORITY OF THE
COUNTY’S INTENT TO PURCHASE SHAMROCK FARMS.
(4) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, TO PAY FOR
THE PURCHASE AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION THE COUNTY
COMMISSIONERS OF CARROLL COUNTY MAY:
(I) USE THE COUNTY’S GENERAL FUND; AND
(II) ACCEPT DONATIONS FROM ANY SOURCE.
(5) THE COUNTY COMMISSIONERS OF CARROLL COUNTY MAY PAY
FOR THE PURCHASE AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION IN EQUAL ANNUAL
INSTALLMENTS OVER 5 YEARS.
(6) IF SHAMROCK FARMS IS TRANSFERRED TO CARROLL COUNTY,
ON THE TRANSFER ALL RIGHTS AND AUTHORITY OVER SHAMROCK FARMS,
INCLUDING ANY ZONING AUTHORITY, TRANSFER TO CARROLL COUNTY.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
10–305.
(a) Subject to subsections (b) and (c) of this section, any real or personal property
of the State or a unit of the State government may be sold, leased, transferred, exchanged,
granted, or otherwise disposed of:

HOUSE BILL 1215
(1) to any person, to the United States or any of its units, or to any unit of
the State government, for a consideration the Board decides is adequate; or
(2) to any county or municipal corporation in the State subject to any
conditions the Board imposes.
(b) (1) (i) Except as provided under subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph,
this subsection applies to the sale, transfer, grant, or exchange of:
1. real property identified under § 5–310(c)(1) of this article;
and
2. State–owned real or personal property, funded in
accordance with an appropriation act of the General Assembly, that has an appraised value
over $100,000.
(ii) This subsection does not apply to the following dispositions of
property identified in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph:
1. leasing the property;
2. the sale, transfer, grant, or exchange of a corrective or
access easement on the property; [or]
3. an exchange by the Department of Natural Resources
under § 1–109(e)(3) of the Natural Resources Article; OR
4. THE SALE OF PROPERTY IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
12–404(E) OF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) In this section, “Shamrock Farms” has the meaning stated in § 12–404(e) of
the Local Government Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act.
(b) If the County Commissioners of Carroll County do not provide notice on or
before July 1, 2029, to the Maryland Stadium Authority of the county’s intent to purchase
Shamrock Farms in accordance with § 12–404 of the Local Government Article, as enacted
by Section 1 of this Act, Section 1 of this Act, with no further action required by the General
Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
(c) The Maryland Stadium Authority shall notify the Department of Legislative
Services within 15 days after:
(1) receiving the notice described under subsection (b) of this section from
the County Commissioners of Carroll County of the county’s intent to purchase Shamrock
Farms; or

HOUSE BILL 1215 5
(2) the failure of the County Commissioners of Carroll County to provide
the notice described under subsection (b) of this section of the county’s intent to purchase
Shamrock Farms.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.